Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7441
Prescription drug, defined.

Prescription drug means any human drug required by federal law or regulation to be dispensed only by prescription, including finished dosage forms and active ingredients subject to section 503(b) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, as such section existed on August 1, 2006.

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 11;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-7411;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 15.